Nevada, session 83, SB280.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the University of Nevada, Las Vegas, School of
Dental Medicine the sum of $1,314,000 for the creation of a cleft
and craniofacial medical team. The team shall:
(a) Obtain approval as a Cleft Palate and Craniofacial Team
from the American Cleft Palate Craniofacial Association, or its
successor organization;
(b) Provide cleft and craniofacial health care services through a
clinic that is open:
(1) At least 4 hours for at least 1 day each month; and
(2) If the team determines there is a need and that resources
are available, at least 8 hours for at least 2 days each month;
(c) Provide services to:
(1) Children who are less than 3 years of age; and
(2) If the team determines that resources are available,
children with special needs who are at least 3 years of age but less
than 18 years of age;
(d) Establish partnerships with other institutions of higher
education in this State and any other organization that may assist the
team in complying with this subsection.
2. Any remaining balance of an appropriation made by this
section must not be committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027,
by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity to
which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)